Hawaii statutes.
§246-25 Rules and regulations. The
director of taxation may promulgate rules and regulations as may be necessary
to administer sections 246-26 to 246-36. [L 1961, c 60, §4; Supp, §128-12.5;
HRS §246-25]

Cross References

Rulemaking procedure,
see chapter 91.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next